Idaho, session 2026, H0973.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chapter
239, Laws of 2025, and any other appropriation provided by law, there is
hereby appropriated to the Military Division for the Federal/State Agree-
ments Program $6,500,000 from the Federal Grant Fund to be expended for
operating expenditures for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026,
for the purpose of replacing climate control systems in Air National Guard
buildings at Gowen Field.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
passage and approval.